Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.540

Settlement of Indian claims.

(1) The settlement of Indian land and other claims against public and private property owners is declared to be in the interest of public health and safety, orderly government, environmental protection, economic development, and the social well-being of the citizens of this state, and to specifically benefit the properties released from those claims.

It is the purpose of *this act to encourage the settlement of such Indian land and other claims lawsuits by permitting the establishment and use of local improvement districts to finance all or a portion of the settlement costs of such lawsuits.

(2) A local improvement district may be established by a county legislative authority to finance all or part of the settlement costs in an Indian land and other claims settlement related to public and private property located within the incorporated or unincorporated areas of the county. The settlement of an Indian land and other claims lawsuit shall be deemed to be an improvement that may be financed in whole or in part through use of a local improvement district.

(3) Except as expressly provided in this section, all matters relating to the establishment and operation of such a local improvement district, the levying and collection of special assessments, the issuance of local improvement district bonds and other obligations, and all related matters, shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 36.94 RCW concerning the use of local improvement districts to finance sewer or water facilities. The requirements of chapter 36.94 RCW concerning the preparation of a general plan and formation of a review committee shall not apply to a local improvement district used to finance all or a portion of Indian land and other claims settlements. The resolution or petition that initiates the creation of a local improvement district used to finance all or a portion of an Indian land and other claims settlement shall describe the general nature of the Indian land and other claims and the proposed settlement. The value of a contribution by any person, municipal corporation, political subdivision, or the state of money, real property, or personal property to the settlement of Indian land and other claims shall be credited to any assessment for a local improvement district under this section.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 4 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "This act" consists of the enactment of this section, RCW 35.43.280, and an uncodified section.

Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 4: See note following RCW 35.43.280.